Massachusetts, session 194th, H1876.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 11 of chapter 211D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking subsection (a), and inserting the following 
subsection:- 
(a) The rates of compensation payable to all counsel, who are appointed or assigned to 
represent indigents within the private counsel division of the committee in accordance with the 
provisions of paragraph (b) of section 6, shall, subject to appropriation, be as follows: for 
homicide cases the rate of compensation shall be $150 per hour; for superior court non-homicide 
cases, including sexually dangerous person cases, the rate of compensation shall be $105 per 
hour; for district court cases and children in need of services cases the rate of compensation shall 
be $73 per hour; for children and family law cases and care and protection cases the rate of 
compensation shall be $90 per hour; for sex offender registry cases and mental health cases the 
rate of compensation shall be $90 per hour. These rates of compensation shall be reviewed 

of 2 13 periodically at public hearings held by the committee at appropriate locations throughout the 
state, and notice shall be given to all state, county and local bar associations and other interested 
groups, of such hearings by letter and publication in advance of such hearings. This periodic 
review shall take place not less than once every 3 years. 
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.